Wisconsin, session 2025, SB805.
do enact as follows:SB805,11Section 1. 118.077 of the statutes is created to read:SB805,2,42118.077 Recess. (1) Definition. In this section, “recess” means time 3during the school day during which pupils are given supervised and unstructured 4time for any of the following:SB805,2,55(a) Physical activity.SB805,2,66(b) Play.SB805,2,77(c) Organized games.SB805,2,88(d) Social engagement with other pupils.SB805,2,119(2) Recess; requirements. (a) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each 10school board and operator of a charter school shall schedule at least 60 minutes of 11recess each school day for pupils in grades kindergarten to 6.SB805,2,1412(b) Time during which pupils transfer to and from recess, including any time 13spent dressing or undressing to be outdoors during recess, does not count towards 14the requirement under par. (a).SB805,2,1715(c) The school board or operator of a charter school shall ensure that pupils do 16not use computers, tablets, phones, or other personal electronic devices during 17recess that fulfills the requirement under par. (a).SB805,3,318(3) Withholding recess; prohibited. No school board or operator of a 19charter school may withhold recess as a disciplinary or punitive action, unless a 20pupil’s participation in recess poses an immediate threat to the safety of the pupil or 1others. Each school board and operator of a charter school shall take all reasonable 2efforts to resolve such threats and minimize the use of exclusion from recess to the 3greatest extent practicable.SB805,3,64(4) Department; guidance. The department shall provide school boards and 5operators of charter schools with guidance and model professional development 6resources for implementing this section.SB805,27Section 2. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 42, is 8amended to read:SB805,3,229119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1066.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 11115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 12115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 118.077, 13118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 14118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 15118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 16118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 17118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) 18(b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 19120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and 20board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a 21contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools 22and partnership program.SB805,323Section 3. 121.02 (1) (f) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 24is amended to read:SB805,4,91121.02 (1) (f) Annually, schedule at least 437 hours of direct pupil instruction 2in kindergarten, at least 1,050 hours of direct pupil instruction in grades 1 to 6 and 3at least 1,137 hours of direct pupil instruction in grades 7 to 12. Scheduled hours 4under this paragraph include recess and time for pupils to transfer between classes 5but do not include the lunch period, except that the department may not count more 6than 60 minutes per day of recess towards the requirement under this paragraph. 7Scheduled hours under this paragraph do not include hours of direct pupil 8instruction offered during an interim session. Scheduled hours under this 9paragraph may include hours on Saturdays.SB805,4,1010